Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,182
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Remedial Action Plan Monitoring Act:

(1) Land pollution means the presence upon or within the land resources of the state of one or more contaminants or combinations of contaminants, including, but not limited to, solid waste, hazardous waste, petroleum, or hazardous substances, in such quantities and of such quality as will or are likely to (a) create a nuisance, (b) be harmful, detrimental, or injurious to public health, safety, or welfare, (c) be injurious to plant and animal life and property, or (d) be detrimental to the economic and social development, the scenic beauty, or the enjoyment of the natural attractions of the state; and

(2) Water pollution means the manmade or man-induced alteration of the chemical, physical, biological, or radiological integrity of water.

Laws 1994, LB 1349, § 2;

Laws 2004, LB 449, § 5.